Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 2 Powers and Duties Generally

Cross references.

Power of Governor to convene general courts-martial, § 38-2-390.

Power of Governor to prescribe procedure in cases before military courts and other military tribunals, § 38-2-430.

Power of Governor to institute and conduct investigations into affairs of state, etc., generally, §

45-15-19

.

45-12-20.
Grant of commissions.

The Governor shall grant commissions to all officers, including senators and representatives in Congress, required to hold them and in all cases may, in his discretion, issue a dedimus potestatem to officers authorized to administer oaths requiring qualification of the officers-elect as provided by law. The forms of commissions shall be in the discretion of the Governor. Commissions thus issued shall be final, except where the Constitution and laws of Georgia shall otherwise provide.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 69; Code 1868, § 63; Code 1873, § 60; Code 1882, § 60; Civil Code 1895, § 121; Civil Code 1910, § 144; Code 1933, § 40-203; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

45-12-21.
Issuance of warrants for payments from treasury.

All payments from the state treasury, unless otherwise provided, shall be made upon the warrant of the Governor, and he may withhold his approval on any account audited by the state auditor and certified by the comptroller general. The warrant shall always specify on what appropriation or fund it is drawn.

History.

Laws 1836, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 1028; Code 1863, § 77; Code 1868, § 71; Code 1873, § 76; Code 1882, § 76; Civil Code 1895, § 140; Civil Code 1910, § 163; Code 1933, § 40-204; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 45/HB 79.

45-12-22.
Suspension of collection of taxes.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, the Governor may suspend the collection of taxes, or any part thereof, due the state until the meeting of the next General Assembly but no longer; but he or she shall not otherwise interfere with the collection of taxes.

Unless there has been a state of emergency declaration by the Governor, the Governor shall not suspend or modify in any manner the collection of any rate of state motor fuel taxes under Code Section 48-9-3 as it applies to sales of motor fuel and aviation gasoline as such terms are defined in Code Section 48-9-2 or taxes levied on the sale or use of jet fuel as such term is defined in Code Section 48-8-2. Any suspension or modification of any rate of state motor fuel taxes or taxes levied on the sale or use of jet fuel under this subsection by the Governor shall be effective only until the next meeting of the General Assembly which must ratify such suspension or modification by a two-thirds’ vote of both chambers. In the event the General Assembly fails to ratify the Governor’s actions, state motor fuel taxes or taxes on the sale or use of jet fuel suspended or modified under this subsection shall be collected at the rate specified absent such suspension or modification and any amounts unpaid due to such suspension or modification shall be collected using such rate.

History.

Laws 1821, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 1025; Code 1863, § 76; Code 1868, § 70; Code 1873, § 75; Code 1882, § 75; Civil Code 1895, § 139; Civil Code 1910, § 162; Code 1933, § 40-205; Ga. L. 2015, p. 236, § 4-1/HB 170; Ga. L. 2016, p. 846, § 45/HB 737; Ga. L. 2018, Ex. Sess., p. ES7, § 1-1/HB 5EX.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, designated the previously existing provisions of this Code section as subsection (a); in subsection (a), substituted “Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, the” for “The” at the beginning, and inserted “or she” near the end; and added subsection (b).

The 2016 amendment,

effective May 3, 2016, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “state motor fuel taxes under” for “state motor fuel under” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

The 2018 Ex. Sess. amendment,

effective November 17, 2018, in subsection (b), inserted “or taxes levied on the sale or use of jet fuel as such term is defined in Code Section 48-8-2” at the end of the first sentence, inserted “or taxes levied on the sale or use of jet fuel” in the middle of the second sentence, and inserted “or taxes on the sale or use of jet fuel suspended or modified” near the beginning of the third sentence.

Cross references.

Preservation of state’s sovereign right of taxation, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VII, Sec. I, Para. I.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 236, § 8-1/HB 170, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Transportation Funding Act of 2015.’ ”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 236, § 8-2/HB 170, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is the intention of the General Assembly, subject to appropriations and other constitutional obligations of this state, that year to year revenue increases be prioritized to fund education, transportation, and health care in this state.”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 236, § 9-1(b)/HB 170, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Tax, penalty, and interest liabilities and refund eligibility for prior taxable years shall not be affected by the passage of this Act and shall continue to be governed by the provisions of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated as it existed immediately prior to the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2015.

Ga. L. 2021, Ex. Sess., p. HR 3EX, provides for the ratification of the suspension of collection of motor fuel and diesel fuel taxes as declared by Executive Order Nos. 05.10.21.02, 05.14.21.01, 05.21.21.01, and 05.28.21.03 issued by Governor Brian P. Kemp in response to a state of emergency for petroleum shortage resulting from the cyberattack installed ransomware on Colonial Pipeline Company's Information Technology systems.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 261 (2015).

45-12-23.
Incapacity of Commissioner of Insurance.

Whenever the Governor receives information, deemed by him to be reliable, that the Commissioner of Insurance, by reason of sickness or other providential cause, is unable to perform the duties of his office, the Governor shall call a council to be composed of himself, the Secretary of State, and an appointee of the Governor who is not the Attorney General; and, if such council, or a majority thereof, after investigation and examination into the truth of such report, shall, in writing duly signed, find that such officer is incapable of performing the duties of his office, the Governor, in case of incapacity of the Commissioner of Insurance, shall designate the chief clerk or other clerk then serving in the office of the Commissioner of Insurance to perform the duties of the Commissioner of Insurance during his incapacity. The person so designated to perform the duties of the Commissioner of Insurance shall give bond with good security in the penal sum of $5,000.00, payable, conditioned, and to be approved in the same manner as the bond required by law to be given by the Commissioner of Insurance. The person designated to perform the duties of the Commissioner of Insurance shall not receive any compensation in addition to that he was, or is, receiving as clerk, but any expense incurred in furnishing the bond required by this Code section and Code Section 45-12-24 shall be borne by the state. When the person designated under authority of this Code section and Code Section 45-12-24 shall have given the bond required and said bond has been approved as required, he shall be authorized to do everything, perform every act, and exercise every prerogative or discretion that the Commissioner of Insurance might do, perform, or exercise under existing law in the absence of his incapacity.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 608, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 23; Ga. L. 1988, p. 426, § 1.

45-12-24.
Proceedings upon cessation of incapacity; payment of salary of officer during period of incapacity.

Whenever it shall be made to appear to the council composed of the Governor, the Secretary of State, and the Attorney General, as provided in this Code section and Code Section 45-12-23 or a majority thereof, that the incapacity of the Commissioner of Insurance has been overcome and removed, a finding in writing to that effect shall be made and filed in the Governor’s office; and thereupon the authority of the person designated to act for the Commissioner of Insurance shall come to an end and the Commissioner of Insurance shall assume and perform the duties of his office. During the period of the incapacity of the Commissioner of Insurance, the salaries due as provided by existing law shall continue to be paid.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 608, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 24; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 45.

45-12-25.
Books of record to be maintained by Governor.

The Governor shall cause to be kept and preserved in the executive department the following books of record:

A journal or minute book showing all of his official acts;

A book of appropriations in which shall be entered a full account of all annual appropriations, setting forth the amounts under their appropriate headings together with the date of his warrant for such appropriation and in whose favor drawn;

A book giving a statement of the public debt, the dates and numbers of the bonds issued, in whose favor, for what amounts, the date of payment, and the disposition thereof; also, a full and accurate account of all sums set apart as a sinking fund for the redemption of the public debt, particularly setting forth the amount for the several specific purposes, when drawn, and in whose favor drawn;

A book in which shall be kept copies of the bonds of officers or agents disbursing public funds; also, a schedule of bonds and other evidences of debt due the state and the disposition thereof;

A book showing the exact condition of the educational fund of the state and the annual income thereof;

A book or books containing a list of the respective numbers, districts, sections, and counties of the several lots of land disposed of by the several land lotteries, the names of the drawers of each, to whom and when granted, and a similar schedule of all lands sold by the state, by whom purchased, and to whom and when granted;

A book which is an index or key to all the documents appertaining to his office, which documents he has carefully filed away, properly marked or numbered; and

Any other books or files that, in his judgment, the executive department needs.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 78; Code 1868, § 72; Code 1873, § 77; Code 1882, § 77; Civil Code 1895, § 141; Civil Code 1910, § 164; Code 1933, § 40-208; Ga. L. 1945, p. 402, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

45-12-26.
Defense of action in which state has interest.

Unless otherwise specially provided for, the Governor, in his discretion, shall provide for the defense of any action instituted against the state or any action instituted against any person, the result of which is of interest to the state because of any claim inconsistent with the state’s sovereignty, jurisdiction, or rights.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 24; Code 1868, § 22; Code 1873, § 22; Code 1882, § 22; Civil Code 1895, § 23; Civil Code 1910, § 23; Code 1933, § 40-209.

Cross references.

Power of Governor to direct Department of Law to institute and prosecute matters, proceedings, and litigations in name of state, §

45-15-35

.

Law reviews.

For note, “Perdue v. Baker: Who Has the Ultimate Power Over Litigation on Behalf of the State of Georgia — The Governor or the Attorney General?,” see
21 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 751 (2005).

45-12-27.
Calling out militia to execute laws.

It shall be the duty of the Governor to see that the laws of this state are executed. For this purpose he shall have the power, as commander in chief, to call out the state militia whenever, in his discretion, the due enforcement of the process of the courts shall be so resisted and defied as to require such intervention.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 58; Code 1868, § 54; Code 1873, § 51; Code 1882, § 51; Civil Code 1895, § 118; Civil Code 1910, § 141; Code 1933, § 40-201.

Cross references.

Status of Governor as commander-in-chief of militia, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. V, Sec. II, Para. III.

45-12-28.
Calling out militia for defense of state in case of invasion or insurrection.

In case of invasion or insurrection, the Governor may call out the state militia for the defense of the state until such time as the General Assembly shall meet; and, when he takes such action, he shall have power to make all necessary provision for their transportation, accommodation, equipment, and support.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 59; Code 1868, § 55; Code 1873, § 52; Code 1882, § 52; Civil Code 1895, § 119; Civil Code 1910, § 142; Code 1933, § 40-202.

Cross references.

Further provisions regarding authority of Governor to call out militia, §

38-2-6

.

45-12-29.
Powers to prevent violence and maintain order — General authority.

The Governor is authorized to perform any action which, in his discretion, is necessary to prevent overt threats of violence or acts of violence to the personal property of citizens of the state and to maintain peace, tranquility, and good order in the state or in any area or political subdivision thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 44, § 1.

Cross references.

Authority of Governor to declare extreme forest fire emergency, §

12-6-89

.

Emergency orders pertaining to dangers to public health and safety in connection with solid waste handling activities, §

12-8-31

.

Emergencies involving imminent and substantial danger to environment or public health as result of hazardous waste management, §

12-8-75

.

Emergency situations involving air pollution, §

12-9-14

.

Governor’s power to postpone or extend qualifying periods for election during state of emergency, §

21-2-50.1

.

Power of Governor to appoint special policemen for protection of property, T. 35, C. 9.

Further provisions regarding emergency powers of Governor, §§

38-2-6

,

38-3-22

,

38-3-51

.

45-12-30.
Powers to prevent violence and maintain order — Proclamation of emergency; issuance and enforcement of orders.

When, in his opinion, the facts warrant, the Governor shall, by proclamation, declare that, because of unlawful assemblage, violence, overt threats of violence, or otherwise, a danger exists to the person or property of any citizen or citizens of the state and that the peace and tranquility of the state or of any area or political subdivision thereof is threatened, and because thereof an emergency, with reference to said threats and danger, exists. In all such cases, when the Governor shall issue his proclamation he shall be and is further authorized, in coping with said threats and danger, to order and direct any person, corporation, association, or group of persons to do any act which would, in his opinion, prevent danger to life, limb, or property or prevent a breach of the peace; or he may order such person, corporation, association, or group of persons to refrain from doing any act or thing which would, in his opinion, endanger life, limb, or property or cause, or tend to cause, a breach of the peace, or endanger the peace and good order of society; and he shall have full power to enforce such order or proclamation by appropriate means.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 44, § 2.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 07.31.20.02, 08.15.20.01, 08.31.20.02, 09.15.20.01, 09.30.20.02, 10.15.20.01, 10.30.20.02, 11.13.20.01, 11.20.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.01, 01.07.21.02, 01.15.21.01, 01.22.21.07, 01.29.21.02, 02.15.21.01, 02.26.21.02, 03.12.21.01, 03.31.21.03, 04.30.21.01, 05.06.21.01, and 05.28.21.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

Law reviews.

For article, “Preemption:
Executive Order by the Governor to Ensure a Safe & Healthy Georgia:
Preemption,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 95 (2020).

45-12-31.
Powers to prevent violence and maintain order — Filing of proclamation; powers of Governor over civil and military officials generally.

Upon the issuance of a proclamation as provided for in Code Section 45-12-30, the Governor shall immediately file the same in the office of the Secretary of State for recording. The proclamation shall be effective upon issuance and shall remain in full force and effect until revoked by the Governor; and he is authorized to take and exercise any or all of the following actions, powers, and prerogatives:

Call out the military forces of the state (state militia) and order and direct said forces to take such action as in his judgment may be necessary to avert the threatened danger and to maintain peace and good order in the particular circumstances;

Order any sheriff or sheriffs of this state to exercise fully the powers granted them (suppress tumults, riots, and unlawful assemblies in their counties with force and strength when necessary) and to do all things necessary to maintain peace and good order;

Order and direct the Department of Public Safety and each and every officer thereof to do and perform such acts and services as he may direct and as in his judgment may be necessary to maintain peace and good order in the circumstances;

Authorize, order, or direct any state, county, or city official to enforce such proclamation by injunction, mandamus, or other appropriate legal action in any and all courts of the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 44, § 6.

Cross references.

Further provisions regarding authority of Governor to call out militia, §

38-2-6

.

45-12-32.
Powers to prevent violence and maintain order — Promulgation and enforcement of emergency rules and regulations.

The Governor is authorized to promulgate and enforce such emergency rules and regulations as are necessary to prevent, control, or quell violence, threatened or actual, during any emergency lawfully declared by him to exist. In order to protect the public welfare, to protect the persons and property of citizens against violence, to prevent damage to public property, and to maintain peace, tranquility, and good order in the state, such rules and regulations may control public parks, public buildings, public utilities, or any other public facility in Georgia and shall regulate the manner of use, the time of use, and the persons using the facility during any emergency. Such rules and regulations shall have the force and effect of law during any emergency and shall remain in effect during a period of time and in such manner and shall affect such persons, public buildings, public utilities, and public facilities as in the judgment of the Governor shall best provide a safeguard for protection of persons and property where danger and violence exist or are threatened among the citizens of Georgia.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 44, § 3.

45-12-33.
Powers to prevent violence and maintain order — Publishing and posting of emergency rules and regulations.

Whenever the Governor shall promulgate emergency rules and regulations, such rules and regulations shall be published and posted during the emergency in the area affected; and copies of the rules shall be filed with the Secretary of State and shall be a part of the public record.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 44, § 4.

45-12-34.
Powers to prevent violence and maintain order — Enforcement of rules and regulations.

The Governor shall have emergency power to call upon the military forces of the state or any other state or county law enforcement agency to enforce the rules and regulations authorized by Code Sections 45-12-29 through 45-12-33.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 44, § 5.

45-12-35.
Reward for detection or apprehension of perpetrators of felonies or cattle, horse, or swine thieves.

For the purposes of this Code section, the term “conviction” means a final judgment of conviction entered upon a verdict of guilty or upon a plea of guilty. Such judgment shall be deemed to be a final judgment when the remittitur from the appellate court of this state affirming the conviction is filed in the court below or, if the proceeding is before a federal court, when the United States Circuit Court of Appeals has affirmed the conviction.

The Governor and any county or municipal governing authority shall, in their discretion, offer and cause to be paid rewards for the detection or apprehension of the perpetrator of any felony committed within this state, such reward not to exceed the sum of $1,000.00 in felonies not capital, including arson, and not to exceed the sum of $10,000.00 in capital felonies and arson; provided, however, that the amount offered by any local governing authority shall not exceed the aggregate amount of $25,000.00.

The Governor shall, at the Governor’s discretion, offer and cause to be paid rewards for the detection or apprehension of cattle, horse, ratites, or swine thieves stealing cattle, horses, ratites, or swine within this state; and such reward shall not exceed $1,000.00.

The Governor, at his discretion, may pay any reward authorized by this Code section after conviction.

No reward provided for in this Code section shall be paid to any officer who arrests such person in the regular discharge of his or her duty by virtue of process in his or her hands to be executed nor to any person who has arrested the offender prior to the publication of the reward.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 65; Code 1868, § 61; Ga. L. 1872, p. 11, § 1; Code 1873, § 58; Ga. L. 1875, p. 104, § 1; Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 165, § 1; Code 1882, § 58; Penal Code 1895, § 881; Penal Code 1910, § 902; Code 1933, § 27-101; Ga. L. 1962, p. 693, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 278, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2033, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1173, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 290, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 244, § 32; Ga. L. 1997, p. 581, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 45; Ga. L. 2006, p. 519, § 6/HB 1302.

Cross references.

Reward for information leading to capture of escaped inmate, §

42-1-2

.

45-12-36.
Reward for information leading to identification, apprehension, and conviction of persons who cause the death of a law enforcement officer.

For the purposes of this Code section, “conviction” means a final judgment of conviction entered upon a verdict of guilty or upon a plea of guilty. Such judgment shall be deemed to be a final judgment when the remittitur from the appellate court of this state affirming the conviction is filed in the court below or, if the proceeding is before a federal court, when the United States Circuit Court of Appeals has affirmed the conviction.

Any person, except a person who shall be charged with the power, duty, and responsibility of enforcing the criminal laws of this state, who furnishes the necessary information which leads to the identification, apprehension, and conviction of a person who has committed the crime of murder or voluntary manslaughter, where the victim of such crime was a law enforcement officer acting in the line of duty at the time of the commission of such crime, may be entitled to receive a reward in an amount up to $10,000.00. No reward offered under this Code section shall be awarded unless the information furnished possesses such unique qualities that without the divulgence thereof by the person claiming the reward, the identity of the perpetrator of such crime and the evidence leading to his conviction would not have been readily ascertainable from other sources during the ordinary course of a routine investigation of the crime. In those instances where, in the judgment of the Governor, one or more persons should be entitled to the reward, the Governor shall direct the division of the reward among those entitled thereto at his discretion or he may rely upon the advice of the district attorney or other official prosecuting the case as to the appropriate division of the reward.

The Governor, at his discretion, may pay any reward authorized by this Code section after conviction.

The Governor may pay such reward to any such person from funds appropriated to the executive branch of the state government for such purpose.

History.

Code 1933, § 27-101.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1970, p. 447, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1173, § 2.

Cross references.

Reward for information leading to capture of escaped inmate, §

42-1-2

.

45-12-37.
Reward for information leading to arrest and conviction of person selling dangerous or narcotic drugs generally; rewards by counties and municipalities.

For the purposes of this Code section, “conviction” means a final judgment of conviction entered upon a verdict of guilty or upon a plea of guilty. Such judgment shall be deemed to be a final judgment when the remittitur from the appellate court of this state affirming the conviction is filed in the court below or, if the proceeding is before a federal court, when the United States Circuit Court of Appeals has affirmed the conviction.

Any person, other than a law enforcement officer, who furnishes information leading to the arrest and conviction of a person who is charged with selling dangerous drugs in violation of Code Section 16-13-72 may receive a reward of up to $500.00. Any person, other than a law enforcement officer, who furnishes information leading to the arrest and conviction of a person who is charged with selling a controlled substance in violation of Code Section 16-13-30 or 16-13-31, may receive a reward of $1,000.00.

The Governor, at his discretion, may pay any reward authorized by this Code section after conviction.

The Governor, at his discretion, may pay such reward to any such person from funds appropriated or otherwise available to the executive branch of the state government.

Counties and municipalities wherein the crime was committed are authorized, but not required, to supplement or make rewards to persons entitled to receive a reward, as provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section, in an amount not to exceed $200.00 paid from county funds and $200.00 paid from municipal funds for each such person. Any rewards paid pursuant to this subsection shall be paid at the time the conviction becomes final, as provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section, from the funds of any such county or municipality, as the case may be. It is declared that any funds expended pursuant to this subsection are expended for a public purpose.

When more than one person furnishes information which would entitle them to receive the rewards pursuant to subsections (b) through (e) of this Code section, such rewards shall be paid to the first person furnishing such information; and, if more than one person furnishes such information at the same time, such rewards shall be prorated among all persons furnishing such information.

History.

Code 1933, § 27-101.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1970, p. 447, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 725, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1173, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 45.

Cross references.

Reward for information leading to capture of escaped inmate, §

42-1-2

.

45-12-38.
Temporary transfer of institution between departments or agencies authorized; special report to General Assembly.

At any time during the interim period between regular sessions of the General Assembly, the Governor may make a temporary transfer of any penal, correctional, educational, or eleemosynary institution of this state from one department or agency of state government to another when in his opinion the public interest so demands, except that no such temporary transfer shall be made to or from the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia.

Whenever a temporary transfer of a state institution is made by the Governor under this Code section, he shall submit to the next regular session of the General Assembly a special report detailing said transfer and stating the reasons therefor.

Any temporary transfer of a state institution by the Governor pursuant to this Code section shall become permanent upon the expiration of the next regular session of the General Assembly following this transfer unless during that session a resolution disapproving said transfer shall have been adopted by both houses.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 891, §§ 1-3.

45-12-39.
Annual report to General Assembly on administration’s policies and goals.

On or before the fifth day of each regular session of the General Assembly, it shall be the duty of the Governor to furnish a written report to each member of the General Assembly stating his administration’s policies and goals on the following subjects:

Intellectual development;

Human development;

Transportation and communications;

Economic development;

Protection of persons and property;

Natural environment; and

General government.

The reports required of the Governor by subsection (a) of this Code section may include any subjects in addition to those required by said subsection. Such reports may be in such form as the Governor shall determine; and the Governor, at his discretion, may elect not to issue the report during the last year of his term of office.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 478, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1194, § 1.

45-12-40.
Cooperation with other states on federal grants.

For the purpose of establishing and administering federal grant programs administered by the State of Georgia, the Governor or his designee is authorized to cooperate with or enter into agreements with any official of another state. The Governor or his designee is authorized to enter into contracts and perform all things necessary in his discretion to secure to this state and citizens of this state the benefits of federal grant programs.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 178, § 1.

45-12-41.
Governor’s delegation of powers under applicable federal transportation planning and air quality laws and regulations.

The Governor may delegate to any department, authority, or qualified entity, by executive order, his or her powers under applicable federal transportation planning and air quality laws and regulations, including without limitation the power to approve state-wide transportation improvement programs under 23 U.S.C. Section 134 and 23 C.F.R. Sections 450.312(b), 450.324(b), and 450.328(a).

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 377, § 4-6/HB 930.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 3, 2018.

U.S. Code.

Metropolitan transportation planning is codified at

23 U.S.C. § 134

.